Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Special Needs Trusts

387.855.
Guardian or conservator may consider benefits of establishing a special
needs trust.

In developing and establishing a plan to preserve and protect a ward’s assets pursuant to this chapter, a guardian, conservator, or limited conservator may consider the benefits to the ward of establishing a special needs trust for the ward.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 8, effective July 12, 2012.

387.860.
Definitions for KRS 387.855 to 387.910.

The following definitions apply with respect to KRS

387.855

to

387.910

:

“Special needs person” means a person who, by reason of his or her disability, qualifies as a disabled individual under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p and whose disability is the basis for the exemption from Medicaid or Supplemental Security Income (SSI) transfer penalties, or both, either as an individual or as a special needs trust beneficiary under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p;

“Grantor” means an individual who is expressly empowered under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p, or this chapter, to establish a special needs trust for a special needs person, and thus qualifies as a grantor. Further, any individual with standing to petition the court under KRS

387.865

may also serve as a grantor of a special needs trust;

“Special needs trust” means a trust described in 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p(d)(4)(A) or (C) which may receive assets of a special needs person or another person on behalf of the special needs person;

“The court,” for the purposes of KRS

387.855

to

387.910

, means:

Where the special needs person has acquired, or will be acquiring, assets which are the subject of any judicial proceedings, the court where such proceedings had been brought, or where such proceedings are pending; and

In all other cases, in the District Court in the county where the special needs person resides; and

“Interested parties,” for the purposes of this chapter, means:

Any individual who would have standing to petition the court for appointment as a legal guardian or conservator under this chapter;

Any fiduciary of the special needs person, including but not limited to his or her legal guardian, conservator, attorney-in-fact, or trustee whether corporate or individual;

If the special needs person is a ward of the state, the Protection and Advocacy Division of the Department of Public Advocacy; and

If there is, or is believed to be, a Medicare or Medicaid lien, or subrogation rights with respect to the special needs person which have not been fully satisfied or discharged at the time the petition is filed, then the appropriate agency or other holder of such rights or claims.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 9, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 167, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). In subsection (4) of this statute, the Reviser of Statutes has inserted the phrase “KRS

387.855

to

387.910

” in place of a reference to a single statute. In subsection (4) of
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 59, sec. 9, the term “the court” is defined “for the purposes of Section 8 of this Act,” but the term does not appear in Section 8, and it is clear from the context that the definition is intended to apply to the entire range of statutes. This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected under
KRS 7.136(1).

387.865.
Persons who may petition the court to approve a special needs
trust.

Any individual who qualifies as a grantor under KRS

387.860

may petition the court to create, establish, or otherwise approve the creation or establishment of a special needs trust as defined in KRS

387.860

. In addition, the following shall have standing to petition the court to create, establish, or otherwise approve the creation or establishment of a special needs trust:

Any firm or individual which occupies a fiduciary relationship to the special needs person, including but not limited to a guardian ad litem, legal guardian, conservator, limited conservator, trustee of any trust, and personal representative of a decedent’s estate where the special needs person is a beneficiary;

The special needs person himself or herself and his or her spouse;

The siblings or nieces and nephews of the disabled person;

An individual holding power of attorney granted by the special needs person; and

In cases where the special needs person is under disability as described in SCR 3.130(1.14) and there is no individual referred to in this section who is available or willing to petition the court, then legal counsel retained by the special needs person or one who is actively involved on behalf of the special needs person, whether as a social worker, case manager, care provider, or otherwise, shall also have standing to petition the court under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 10, effective July 12, 2012.

387.870.
Contents of petition.

The petition shall set forth a brief statement as to the specific physical or psychological circumstances of the special needs person which form the basis for the petition, and shall include the following information:

The name and address of the petitioner and the petitioner’s relationship to the special needs person;

The name, age, and address of the special needs person;

The name and address of the grantor of the trust, and the grantor’s relationship to the special needs person;

The name, address, and relationship of the proposed trustee or co-trustees of the special needs trust;

The name and address of each reasonably ascertainable interested party;

The facts specific to the special needs person and the petitioner to demonstrate to the court that the establishment of a special needs trust for the special needs person is proper under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p; and

Whether there are any existing liens or claims against the special needs person.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 11, effective July 12, 2012.

387.875.
Additional documents or information to accompany petition.

Along with the petition the court shall be provided with the following documents or information:

A draft of the proposed special needs trust agreement;

If there is litigation pending which involves the special needs person, the petitioner shall submit a brief statement describing the litigation, the expected amount or finally determined amount of the recovery, the existence and amount of any liens or charges applicable to the recovery including any applicable Medicare or Medicaid liens, and the name and address of the payor of the recovery; and

If the special needs person lives in a nursing home or other supervised living arrangement and is receiving, or expected to receive, public assistance benefits, then the petitioner shall inform the court of the nature of the benefits and the amount thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 12, effective July 12, 2012.

387.880.
Court’s disposition of petition
— Notice — Guardian ad litem.

The petition shall be docketed with the court and set for hearing unless the court shall otherwise determine. Notice of the hearing shall be given to each interested party not less than fourteen (14) days in advance, in accordance with KRS

386B.1-070

, unless waived in writing. The court may assign a guardian ad litem to advise the court with respect to the suitability of the special needs trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 13, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 25, § 109, effective July 15, 2014.

387.885.
Court order establishing trust — Other matters to be addressed in court
order.

Upon review of the petition and the supplemental information and report, if it appears to the court that the circumstances indicate that the special needs person qualifies as a beneficiary for whom a special needs trust may properly be established under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p, the court may order that the trust be established. The court may then proceed to determine whether as part of the order there are other matters to be addressed, including but not limited to the following:

Whether the proposed trustee or each co-trustee is suitable;

Whether all or a portion of the assets or income, or both, belonging to or payable to the special needs person should become part of the trust;

Whether there are any charges against the funds which should be paid before the trust be established;

The suitability of requiring surety on the bond of the trustee or co-trustees; and

Any other matters the court deems appropriate for ruling.

The order of the court establishing the trust shall be final and appealable on the same basis as any other civil proceeding involving trusts.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 14, effective July 12, 2012.

387.890.
Court order modifying existing trust — Jurisdiction and venue.

The court may enter an order modifying an existing trust, whether established by the court under this chapter, or whether the trust has been otherwise established, upon petition demonstrating to the court that there is just cause to modify the trust to preserve the trust purposes of protecting the trust assets for the benefit of the special needs person. Any such petition shall comport with KRS

387.870

,

387.875

, and

387.880

. If the trust is administered or registered in a county other than where the special needs person resides when a petition is brought to modify a trust, jurisdiction and venue shall be determined in accordance with KRS

386B.2-030

, except that no such order of modification shall limit, modify, or defeat the trustee’s duty, where required under 42 U.S.C., sec. 1396p, to reimburse the state from the trust assets for benefits paid on behalf of the special needs person at the death of the special needs person, or the termination of the trust during the lifetime of the special needs person, as the case may be.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 15, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 25, § 110, effective July 15, 2014.

387.895.
Court may allow petitioner to contribute additional assets and
income.

Upon appropriate petition in accordance with the above requirements of KRS

387.870

,

387.875

, and

387.880

with respect to the establishment or approval of a special needs trust, the court may also permit the petitioner to add or otherwise contribute additional assets or income, or both, to an existing or newly created or existing special needs trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 16, effective July 12, 2012.

387.900.
Court to determine whether trustee must file settlements.

As part of the order by which the trust is created, the court shall determine whether the trustee of the special needs trust shall or shall not be required to file periodical settlements.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 17, effective July 12, 2012.

387.910.
Purpose of KRS 387.855 to 387.910.

The purpose of KRS

387.855

to

387.910

is primarily to establish a framework by which a disabled individual who qualifies as a special needs person, or his or her family, care manager, or fiduciary, shall have access to the courts to secure the benefits of federal and state law public assistance benefits as set forth in 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p. In construing various provisions of KRS

387.855

to

387.910

, the court shall be mindful of this purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 18, effective July 12, 2012.